tests/v_кил_del.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "The verb кил":
    кил<v><iv><pres><p1><sg> : килетӗп
    кил<v><iv><pres><p2><sg> : килетӗн
    кил<v><iv><pres><p3><sg> : килет
    кил<v><iv><pres><p1><pl> : килетпӗр
    кил<v><iv><pres><p2><pl> : килетӗр
    кил<v><iv><pres><p3><pl> : килеҫҫӗ
    кил<v><iv><past><p1><sg> : килтӗм
    кил<v><iv><past><p2><sg> : килтӗн
    кил<v><iv><past><p3><sg> : килчӗ
    кил<v><iv><past><p1><pl> : килтӗмӗр
    кил<v><iv><past><p2><pl> : килтӗр
    кил<v><iv><past><p3><pl> : килчӗҫ
    кил<v><iv><imp><p1><sg> : килем
    кил<v><iv><imp><p2><sg> : кил
    кил<v><iv><imp><p3><sg> : килтӗр
    кил<v><iv><imp><p1><pl> : килер
    кил<v><iv><imp><p2><pl> : килӗр
    кил<v><iv><imp><p3><pl> : килччӗр
    кил<v><iv><fut><p1><sg> : килӗп
    кил<v><iv><fut><p2><sg> : килӗн
    кил<v><iv><fut><p3><sg> : килӗ
    кил<v><iv><fut><p1><pl> : килӗпӗр
    кил<v><iv><fut><p2><pl> : килӗр
    кил<v><iv><fut><p3><pl> : килӗҫ
    кил<v><iv><cond><p1><sg> : килӗттӗм
    кил<v><iv><cond><p2><sg> : килӗттӗн
    кил<v><iv><cond><p3><sg> : килӗччӗ
    кил<v><iv><cond><p1><pl> : килӗттӗмӗр
    кил<v><iv><cond><p2><pl> : килӗттӗр
    кил<v><iv><cond><p3><pl> : килӗччӗҫ
    кил<v><iv><opt><p1><sg> : килӗпин
    кил<v><iv><opt><p2><sg> : килӗсӗн
    кил<v><iv><opt><p3><sg> : килин
    кил<v><iv><opt><p1><pl> : килӗпӗрин
    кил<v><iv><opt><p2><pl> : килӗсӗр
    кил<v><iv><opt><p3><pl> : килӗҫин
    кил<v><iv><abil><pres><p1><sg> : килеетӗп
    кил<v><iv><abil><pres><p2><sg> : килеетӗн
    кил<v><iv><abil><pres><p3><sg> : килеет
    кил<v><iv><abil><pres><p1><pl> : килеетпӗр
    кил<v><iv><abil><pres><p2><pl> : килеетӗр
    кил<v><iv><abil><pres><p3><pl> : килееҫҫӗ
    кил<v><iv><iter><pres><p1><sg> : килкелетӗп
    кил<v><iv><iter><pres><p2><sg> : килкелетӗн
    кил<v><iv><iter><pres><p3><sg> : килкелет
    кил<v><iv><iter><pres><p1><pl> : килкелетпӗр
    кил<v><iv><iter><pres><p2><pl> : килкелетӗр
    кил<v><iv><iter><pres><p3><pl> : килкелеҫҫӗ
    кил<v><iv><iter><cond><p1><sg> : килкелӗттӗм
    кил<v><iv><iter><cond><p2><sg> : килкелӗттӗн
    кил<v><iv><iter><cond><p3><sg> : килкелӗччӗ
    кил<v><iv><iter><cond><p1><pl> : килкелӗттӗмӗр
    кил<v><iv><iter><cond><p2><pl> : килкелӗттӗр
    кил<v><iv><iter><cond><p3><pl> : килкелӗччӗҫ
